Hawaii statutes.
§346-163 Licenses and temporary permits.
(a) If satisfied that the applicant meets the minimum standards established
pursuant to section 346-162 and subject to the criminal history record checks
and child abuse record checks of section 346-154, the department shall grant
the applicant a license for the operation of a group child care home or group
child care center, as the case may be. The license shall be valid for:

(1) One year for new applicants and for those who
have been licensed for less than four years; and

(2) Two years for those who have been licensed for
four years or more,

unless sooner revoked. Where the activities of the
applicant fall within the licensing requirements of the department of education
and this subpart, a license shall be required from both the department of
education and the department of human services.

A temporary permit may be issued for a period
of six months at the department's discretion to any applicant who is
temporarily unable to conform to all of the minimum standards. Renewal of the
temporary permit shall be left to the department's discretion; provided that
the combined period of the initial and subsequently renewed permits shall not
exceed twenty-four months. Licenses and permits shall be conspicuously posted
on the licensed premises.

(b) The department may establish reasonable
fees for the issuance or renewal of licenses and permits according to rules
adopted pursuant to chapter 91. [L 1985, c 208, pt of §2; am L 1987, c 339, §4;
am L 1998, c 5, §2; am L 2001, c 201, §6; am L 2012, c 161, §2]

Cross References

Criminal history record checks: child caring institutions,
etc., see §846-2.7.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next